Maine, session 132, LD2036.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §3107, sub-§3-B, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 241, §§7 and
8, is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The method by which the program will facilitate and, no later than October 1,
2026, complete the transition from beverage container sorting at redemption
centers by brand to sorting by material type and, for redemption centers that
manually sort containers, by size and deposit value within each material type. The
program must be designed to complete this transition no later than October 1, 2026,
as long as at least 90% of the initiators of deposit included in the program have
provided auditable beverage container sales data to the commingling cooperative
by June 30, 2026. The program may facilitate the negotiation of agreements with
redemption centers to gather brand data through use of reverse vending machines,
account-based bulk processing programs or similar technology as long as the cost
of such data collection is paid by the program;
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §3107, sub-§3-B, ¶C, as amended by PL 2025, c. 241, §9 and
affected by §21, is further amended to read:
C. Within 120 days of receipt of a plan submitted by the cooperative under paragraph
B, the department shall review the plan and approve the plan, approve the plan with
conditions or reject the plan. Prior to determining whether to approve or reject a plan,
the department shall hold a public meeting on the plan. The department shall notify
the cooperative in writing of its determination and, if the plan is approved with
conditions or rejected, shall include in the notification a description of the basis for the
conditions or rejection. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
department's review of and determination of whether to approve or reject a plan
submitted by the cooperative under paragraph B is not a license or permit decision or
other final action of the department and is not subject to the rules adopted by the
department regarding the processing of applications.
(1) If the cooperative's plan is rejected, it may submit a revised plan to the
department within 60 days of receiving the notice of rejection. The department
may approve the revised plan as submitted or approve the revised plan subject to
the implementation of specific changes required by the department.
(2) If the cooperative's plan is approved in accordance with this paragraph, the
cooperative shall implement the plan on or before January 15, 2026 in accordance
with the timeline for implementation described in paragraph B, subparagraph (13),
subject to any changes or conditions imposed by the department. If the cooperative
fails to implement an approved plan on or before January 15, 2026, the initiators
of deposit that are members of each of the commingling groups included in the
cooperative are deemed to be in violation of this chapter and are subject to penalties
pursuant to section 3111.
Sec. 3. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025.